Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4098.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 26. (1) The tribunal may appoint 1 or more hearing officers to hold hearings. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 6 and subject to subsection (2), hearings must be conducted pursuant to chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288, and the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Public notice of the time, date, and place of a hearing must be given in the manner required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. A proposed decision of a hearing officer or referee must be considered and decided by 1 or more members of the tribunal. (2) Hearings conducted under subsection (1) may be held telephonically, by videoconferencing, or in person. Sec. 34. (1) One or more members of the tribunal may hear and decide proceedings. Proceedings conducted under this subsection may be held telephonically, by videoconferencing, or in person. On request by 1 of the parties, an in-person hearing may take place at a location mutually agreed on by all parties and approved by the tribunal. (2) The tribunal shall sit at places throughout this state as the tribunal determines. The county board of commissioners for the county in which the tribunal is sitting, except when the tribunal is sitting in the city of Lansing, shall provide the tribunal with suitable accommodations and equipment on request of the chairperson. The tribunal shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Public notice of the time, date, and place of a meeting subject to the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, must be given in the manner required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4099 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor